Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,179
After-acquired shares.

(MBCA 13.25) (a) A corporation
may elect to withhold payment required by section 21-2,178 from any shareholder
who was required to, but did not, certify that beneficial ownership of all
the shareholder's shares for which appraisal rights are asserted was acquired
before the date set forth in the appraisal notice sent pursuant to subdivision
(b)(1) of section 21-2,176.

(b) If the corporation elected
to withhold payment under subsection (a) of this section, it must, within
thirty days after the form required by subdivision (b)(2)(ii) of section 21-2,176
is due, notify all shareholders who are described in subsection (a) of this
section:

(1)
Of the information required by subdivision (b)(1) of section 21-2,178;

(2) Of the corporation's
estimate of fair value pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) of section 21-2,178;

(3) That they may accept
the corporation's estimate of fair value, plus interest, in full satisfaction
of their demands or demand appraisal under section 21-2,180;

(4) That those shareholders
who wish to accept such offer must so notify the corporation of their acceptance
of the corporation's offer within thirty days after receiving the offer; and

(5) That those shareholders
who do not satisfy the requirements for demanding appraisal under section
21-2,180 shall be deemed to have accepted the corporation's offer.

(c) Within ten days after
receiving the shareholder's acceptance pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section, the corporation must pay in cash the amount it offered under subdivision
(b)(2) of this section to each shareholder who agreed to accept the corporation's
offer in full satisfaction of the shareholder's demand.

(d) Within forty days after
sending the notice described in subsection (b) of this section, the corporation
must pay in cash the amount it offered to pay under subdivision (b)(2) of
this section to each shareholder described in subdivision (b)(5) of this section.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 179.